basic-tokenizer.xfst
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
clear
list AccentedLetter "\u00C0-\u00D6\u00D8-\u00F6\u00F8-\u00FF" ;
define Letter [ alnum | AccentedLetter | %- ] ;
define Word [ Letter + ] ;
define Token [ Word | delim + ] ;
define Whitespace [ space + ] ;
define CollapseWhitespace [ Whitespace @-> "\n" ] ;
define DelimitToken [ Token @-> ... "\n" ] ;
define TokenBoundary ["\n" -> %@] ;
define Tokenize [ DelimitToken .o. CollapseWhitespace .o. TokenBoundary ] ;
regex DownCase(Tokenize,L) ;
invert net
up La   fée cherche                         la            dame.
up La reine voit le géant au-delà du pont.
save stack basic-tokenizer.fst
